Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-208
Good faith, defined.

Good faith shall mean honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 570, § 2.